Hawaii statutes.
§482-25 Duration and renewal. (a) The
registration of a mark shall be effective for a term of five years from the
date of registration. A renewal fee, payable to the director, shall accompany
the application for renewal of the registration.

(b) A registration may be renewed for
successive periods of five years by filing a renewal application within six
months prior to the expiration of the current term, complying with the renewal
requirements prescribed by this chapter, and paying the appropriate renewal
fee.

(c) Any registration in effect on July 1,
2003, shall continue in full force and effect for the unexpired term thereof
and may be renewed by filing an application for renewal with the director in
accordance with this section.

(d) All applications for renewal under this
part shall include a verified statement that the mark has been and is still in
use, and include a specimen showing actual use of the mark on or in connection
with the goods or services for each class of goods and services. [L 2001, c 15,
pt of §1; am L 2003, c 124, §96]

Revision Note

In subsection (c), "July 1, 2003," substituted for
"the date on which this part becomes effective".

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next